Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 7. Purchase of Fish.

Sec. 16.10.265.
Purchase of fish from permit holders.

An individual may not, while acting as a fish processor or primary fish buyer, or as an agent, director, officer, member, or employee of a fish processor, of a primary fish buyer, or of a cooperative corporation organized under AS 10.15, intentionally or knowingly make an original purchase of fish from a seller who does not hold

a landing permit, an entry permit, or an interim-use permit; or

a fish transporter permit under AS

16.05.671

.

An individual who violates (a) of this section is

upon a first conviction, guilty of a class B misdemeanor and shall be sentenced to a fine of not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000, and may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than 90 days;

upon a second conviction, guilty of a class A misdemeanor and shall be sentenced to a fine of not less than $5,000 nor more than $10,000, and may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than one year;

upon a third or subsequent conviction, guilty of a class A misdemeanor and shall be sentenced to a fine of not less than $10,000 nor more than $25,000, and may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than one year.

The commissioner of revenue shall impose upon a fish processor, primary fish buyer, or cooperative corporation organized under AS 10.15, a civil fine equal to the value of fish purchased in violation of this section by (1) the fish processor or primary fish buyer if the fish processor or primary fish buyer is not a corporation; or (2) a director, officer, or employee in a policy-making position of the fish processor, of the primary fish buyer, or of the cooperative corporation. Value is based on the average price paid to fishermen at the time of the violation.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development may suspend or revoke a business license issued under AS

43.70.020

and the commissioner of revenue may suspend or revoke a license to engage in the business of processing or buying raw fish if the licensee or an officer, director, or employee in a policy-making position of the licensee has been convicted of three offenses under this section. Proceedings to suspend or revoke a license are governed by AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

An organization may not be criminally prosecuted under (a) of this section.

In this section, “individual” means a natural person.

History.

(§ 2 ch 94 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 145 SLA 1984; am E.O. No. 68, § 2 (1988); am § 5 ch 112 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in (d) of this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” in (d) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For additional penalty provisions related to unlawful purchase of fish, see AS

16.05.680

.

For penalties for misdemeanors generally, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 16.10.267.
Possession of permit and identification by seller.

When a fisherman sells fish, the fisherman shall possess

a landing permit, entry permit, or interim-use permit issued or transferred to the fisherman under AS 16.43, or other document authorized by regulation to be used in place of an entry permit or interim-use permit; and

an identification card that has been issued to the fisherman by a state or federal agency or other organization designated by the Department of Public Safety and that bears a photograph of the fisherman.

If requested by the purchaser of the fish or by a peace officer, the fisherman or fish transporter shall present for inspection the identification card, entry permit, interim-use permit, fish transporter permit, or other document required to be in the fisherman’s or the fish transporter’s possession under (a) or (d) of this section.

Examples of a suitable identification card required under (a)(2) and (d)(2) of this section are a motor vehicle operator’s license issued under AS

28.15.111

and an identification card issued under AS

18.65.310

.

When a fish transporter sells fish as the agent of the commercial fisherman who caught the fish, the fish transporter shall possess

a fish transporter permit and the fish ticket completed by the fish transporter under AS

16.05.671(d)

; and

an identification card that has been issued to the fish transporter by a state or federal agency or other organization designated by the Department of Public Safety and that bears a photograph of the fish transporter.

A person who violates this section is, upon conviction, guilty of a class B misdemeanor and may be sentenced to a definite term of imprisonment of not more than 90 days. In addition

upon a first conviction for a violation of this section, the court may sentence the convicted person to pay a fine of not more than $5,000 and may order the loss of commercial fishing privileges for a period of not more than three years from the date of conviction;

upon a second conviction for a violation of this section, the court may sentence the convicted person to pay a fine of not more than $10,000 and may order the loss of commercial fishing privileges for a period of not more than three years from the date of conviction;

upon a third or subsequent conviction for a violation of this section, the court

may sentence the convicted person to pay a fine of not more than $10,000; and

shall order that the convicted person lose commercial fishing privileges for a period of three years from the date of conviction.

History.

(§ 2 ch 94 SLA 1982; am § 4 ch 145 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 1989; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 112 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e); relettered in 2003, at which time “(d)(2)” was substituted for “(e)(2)” in subsection (c). In 2012, “(d)” was substituted for “(e)” in subsection (b), to conform to the relettering of (e) as (d) in 2003.

Administrative Code. —

For permits and vessel license required, see 20 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 16.10.268.
Notice of liability.

The commissioner of labor and workforce development shall print posters that contain notice of the requirements of AS

16.10.265

. The commissioner shall distribute the posters to fish processors, primary fish buyers, and cooperative corporations organized under AS 10.15 for the purpose of buying fish.

A fish processor, primary fish buyer, or cooperative corporation organized under AS 10.15 for the purpose of buying fish shall display in a prominent place on its business premises posters provided by the commissioner of labor and workforce development under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 94 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” in (a) and (b) of this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 16.10.269.
Limitations.

AS

16.10.265

and

16.10.267

do not apply to the purchase or sale of aquatic farm products from a holder of a permit issued under
AS

16.40.100

or stock from a holder of a permit issued under
AS

16.40.120

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 145 SLA 1988)

Sec. 16.10.270.
Purchase of fish by the pound.

A fish processor or primary fish buyer shall purchase raw fish by the pound. The poundage of the fish to be purchased shall be determined by weighing the fish unless both the buyer and seller agree in writing upon a sample weighing technique that will fairly determine the average weight of the fish purchased.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 102 SLA 1977)

Sec. 16.10.275.
Regulations.

The commissioner may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of AS

16.10.270

—

16.10.296

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 1981)

Administrative Code. —

For security, see 8 AAC 27, art. 1.

For suspension and revocation of license, see 8 AAC 27, art. 2.

For assignment of claims, see 8 AAC 27, art. 3.

Sec. 16.10.277.
Posting of current salmon price. [Repealed, § 1 ch 13 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 16.10.280.
Price disputes between fishermen and fish processors.

In an area where a price dispute exists between at least one-third of the registered commercial fishermen for that area, as estimated by the Department of Fish and Game on the basis of information available to the department, and fish processors on the price to be paid for salmon, and no agreement has been reached up to 120 days before the opening of the salmon fishing season in that area, a representative from the Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall intervene as mediator of the dispute upon request of either party.

History.

(§ 1 ch 242 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1980; am § 27 ch 132 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

16.10.290

. Renumbered in 1970.

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 16.10.290.
Security for collection of wages and payment for raw fish. [Repealed, § 4, E.O. No. 85 (1993).]

Sec. 16.10.291.
Exemption from bonding requirements. [Renumbered as AS 16.10.293(a).]

Secs. 16.10.292,
16.10.293.
Filing evidence of compliance; exemptions from bonding requirement. [Repealed, § 4, E.O. No. 85 (1993).]

Sec. 16.10.294.
Administrative and judicial orders.

[Repealed, § 4, E.O. No. 85 (1993).]

[Repealed, § 4, E.O. No. 85 (1993).]

[Repealed, § 4, E.O. No. 85 (1993).]

[Repealed, § 4, E.O. No. 85 (1993).]

If the commissioner determines that a fish processor or primary fish buyer is acting in violation of AS

16.10.270

—

16.10.280

, the commissioner shall give written notice prohibiting further action by the person as a fish processor or primary fish buyer. The prohibition continues until the person has submitted evidence acceptable to the commissioner showing that the violation has been corrected.

A person affected by an order issued under AS

16.10.265

—

16.10.296

may seek equitable relief preventing the commissioner from enforcing the order.

In an action instituted in the superior court by the commissioner or a representative of the commissioner, a person acting in the capacity of a fish processor or primary fish buyer in violation of AS

16.10.265

—

16.10.296

may be enjoined from acting as a fish processor or primary fish buyer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 102 SLA 1977; am E.O. No. 85 § 4 (1993); am §§ 15, 16 ch 23 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For security, see 8 AAC 27, art. 1.

For suspension and revocation of license, see 8 AAC 27, art. 2.

Sec. 16.10.295.
Penalty. [Repealed, § 4, E.O. No. 85 (1993).]

Sec. 16.10.296.
Definitions.

In AS

16.10.265

—

16.10.296

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of labor and workforce development;

“fish” means any species of aquatic finfish, invertebrates and amphibians, shellfish, or any other raw fishery resource, in any stage of its life cycle, found in or introduced into the state, and includes fish eggs except fish eggs sold for stock enhancement purposes;

“fish processor” means a person engaging or attempting to engage in a business for which a license is required under AS 43.75;

“primary fish buyer” means a person, other than a cooperative corporation organized under AS 10.15, engaging or attempting to engage in the business of originally purchasing or buying any fishery resource in intrastate, interstate, or foreign commerce.

History.

(§ 2 ch 102 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 94 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of labor” was changed to “commissioner of labor and workforce development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For further definitions, see AS

16.05.940

.